Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1826
Organ and tissue
donations; terms, defined.

For purposes of sections
23-1825 to 23-1832:

(1) Coroner means a coroner or his or her designated representative;

(2) Decedent means an individual with respect to whom a determination
of death has been made pursuant to section 71-7202;

(3) Donor has the definition found in section 71-4825; and

(4) Preliminary investigation means an inquiry into whether
any organs or tissues are necessary to determine the proximate cause or means
of death.

Laws 2008, LB246, § 2;

Laws 2010, LB1036, § 24.